src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  ----------
!! Adverbs in the Anambé language answer questions of manner, degree, spatio-temporal location etc.

LEXICON Adverbs
aywa+Adv:aywa # "/amanhã" ;
karumẽ+Adv:karumẽ # "/tarde" ;
kóraha+Adv:kóraha # "today/hoje" ;
koykawaʼá+Adv:koykawaʼá # "before yesterday/anteontem" ;
nynaheraywa+Adv:nynaheraywa # "after tomorrow/depois de amanhã" ;
pytũby+Adv:pytũby # "/escuro" ;
ypyahó+Adv:ypyahó # "during the day/dia" ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
